Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.3806, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 23. new text end new text begin POLST registry data. new text end new text begin Data collected and maintained by the POLST registry is governed by section 145C.27. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [145C.20] CITATION. new text end new text begin Sections 145C.20 to 145C.28 may be cited as the "Provider Orders for Life-Sustaining Treatment Program Act." new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [145C.21] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin For purposes of sections 145C.20 to 145C.28, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authorized user. new text end new text begin "Authorized user" means a person authorized by the commissioner to provide information to or obtain information from the POLST registry established under section 145C.24. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Life-sustaining treatment. new text end new text begin "Life-sustaining treatment" means any medical procedure, prescription drug, medical device, or medical intervention that maintains life by sustaining, restoring, or supplanting a vital function. Life-sustaining treatment does not include routine care necessary to keep a patient clean or comfortable. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Minnesota POLST Steering Committee. new text end new text begin "Minnesota POLST Steering Committee" means the multidisciplinary committee established and administered by the Minnesota Medical Association that provides POLST education and training according to a contract with the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Nurse practitioner. new text end new text begin "Nurse practitioner" means an individual licensed by the Board of Nursing under sections 148.171 to 148.285 as an advanced practice registered nurse and certified by a national nurse certification organization acceptable to the board to practice as a nurse practitioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Physician. new text end new text begin "Physician" means an individual licensed by the Board of Medical Practice under chapter 147 as a doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathic medicine. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Physician assistant. new text end new text begin "Physician assistant" means an individual licensed by the Board of Medical Practice under chapter 147A as a physician assistant. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin POLST. new text end new text begin "POLST" means a provider order for life-sustaining treatment signed by a physician, nurse practitioner, or physician assistant. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin POLST program. new text end new text begin "POLST program" means the program established under section 145C.23 and includes the POLST registry established under section 145C.24, the POLST registry call center established under section 145C.25, and the education and training required under section 145C.26, subdivision 1. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [145C.22] POLST NOT REQUIRED; REVOCATION; CHOICE TO REMOVE OR NOT INCLUDE. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in sections 145C.20 to 145C.28: new text end new text begin (1) requires a patient to have a POLST; new text end new text begin (2) requires a physician, nurse practitioner, or physician assistant to execute a POLST for a patient; or new text end new text begin (3) requires the commissioner to prescribe the form or content of a POLST or to disseminate forms to be used for a POLST. new text end new text begin (b) The patient for whom a POLST is executed, or the patient's legal representative: new text end new text begin (1) may at any time revoke the patient's POLST; new text end new text begin (2) may at any time choose to have the patient's POLST removed from the POLST registry; and new text end new text begin (3) may choose to not have the patient's POLST included in the POLST registry. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [145C.23] POLST PROGRAM ESTABLISHED. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish and administer a statewide POLST program to help ensure the medical treatment preferences of a patient nearing the end of the patient's life are honored. In establishing the POLST program, the commissioner must comply with all applicable state and federal privacy and security laws and must pursue any changes to state law needed to establish and administer the program. new text end new text begin (b) The POLST program must be based on and consistent with the recommendations in the report required under Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 4, section 100, subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [145C.24] POLST REGISTRY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Registry established. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish and administer a statewide POLST registry for the collection and dissemination of provider orders for life-sustaining treatment. The POLST registry must be aligned with the most recent federal and state health information technology standards and policies to achieve interoperability, improve quality, and leverage national and state activities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authorized users. new text end new text begin (a) Authorized users of the POLST registry must include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) emergency medical responders as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 6; new text end new text begin (2) medical response units registered under section 144E.275; new text end new text begin (3) emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, and paramedics as defined in section 144E.001, subdivisions 5c, 5d, and 5e; and new text end new text begin (4) health care professionals providing services at a hospital, medical clinic, assisted living facility, or skilled nursing facility, or providing services with a home care provider or hospice provider. new text end new text begin (b) Authorized users of the POLST registry are subject to state and federal privacy and security laws and policies, as applicable according to the authorized user's role and organization. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Submission. new text end new text begin (a) The POLST registry must permit authorized users to submit to the registry: new text end new text begin (1) except POLSTs which a patient or the patient's legal representative chooses to not include in the registry, a copy of each current and valid POLST; and new text end new text begin (2) notice of revocation of the POLST, if the patient or the patient's legal representative revokes the POLST. new text end new text begin (b) Unless a patient or the patient's legal representative chooses to not have the patient's POLST included in the registry, all current and valid POLSTs must be submitted to the registry in a prompt manner. An effort must be made to ensure that all current and valid POLSTs, other than those which a patient or the patient's legal representative chooses to not include in the registry, are submitted to the registry. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Obtaining POLSTs. new text end new text begin (a) The POLST registry must have multiple methods for authorized users to obtain POLSTs in a timely manner regardless of the authorized user's location or technological capabilities. Access may be provided through a web-based portal, a POLST registry call center accessed by telephone or radio, and an electronic health record. new text end new text begin (b) The POLST registry must have one or more consumer access methods for patients and their legal representatives to obtain the patient's POLST. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Access by qualified researchers. new text end new text begin The commissioner may authorize qualified researchers to access data from POLSTs in the POLST registry. If the commissioner authorizes qualified researchers to access data from POLSTs, the commissioner must adopt rules governing qualified researcher access to data from POLSTs that must at least address: new text end new text begin (1) the process for a qualified researcher to request access to data from POLSTs in the POLST registry; new text end new text begin (2) the types of data a qualified researcher may access; and new text end new text begin (3) steps a qualified researcher must take to protect data obtained under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Contract. new text end new text begin The commissioner may contract with a public or private entity to establish and administer the POLST registry. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [145C.25] POLST REGISTRY CALL CENTER. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish and administer a POLST registry call center that must operate 24 hours a day, seven days a week to allow authorized users to obtain POLSTs from the POLST registry without the use of broadband service. The POLST registry call center: new text end new text begin (1) must allow authorized users to obtain POLSTs from the POLST registry by telephone or radio; and new text end new text begin (2) must be staffed with medically knowledgeable staff. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [145C.26] MINNESOTA POLST STEERING COMMITTEE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Training and education. new text end new text begin The commissioner must contract with the Minnesota POLST Steering Committee to develop and provide training and education to the public, authorized users, and other health care providers on the use of POLSTs and on the POLST registry. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Advice to commissioner. new text end new text begin The Minnesota POLST Steering Committee must advise the commissioner on: new text end new text begin (1) the form and content of a valid POLST, including any updates to a POLST; and new text end new text begin (2) the procedure for completing a valid POLST. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [145C.27] DATA PRACTICES. new text end new text begin Except for access authorized under section 145C.24 or 145C.25, all data collected, received, or maintained by the POLST registry that identifies or could be used to identify a patient, authorized user, health care provider, or health care facility is classified as private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, or nonpublic data as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9. Data in the POLST registry is not subject to a civil or administrative subpoena and is not subject to discovery in a civil action, including but not limited to a judicial, administrative, arbitration, or mediation proceeding. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [145C.28] IMMUNITY. new text end new text begin A person who reports information in good faith to the POLST registry or who acts in good faith on information obtained from the POLST registry is immune from any civil liability or criminal prosecution that might otherwise apply to the reporting of information to the POLST registry or acting on information obtained from the POLST registry. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin IMPLEMENTATION.new text end new text begin All elements of the POLST program as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 145C.21, subdivision 10, must be implemented by January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for establishment and administration of the POLST registry and POLST registry call center under Minnesota Statutes, sections 145C.24 and 145C.25. The base for this appropriation is $400,000 in fiscal year 2027 and $400,000 in fiscal year 2028. new text end new text begin (b) $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a contract with the Minnesota POLST Steering Committee under Minnesota Statutes, section 145C.26, subdivision 1. new text end